Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 11

Specific Service Signs

54-5-1101. System authorized — Guidelines — State Route 840.

There is authorized to be established a system of specific service signs within the rights-of-way of highways on the interstate system and on adjoining public roads in the vicinity of the highways for the purpose of advising the traveling public of specific business establishments within certain eligible categories. Multi-lane, fully controlled-access roads are permitted to participate in the specific service sign system in accordance with the guidelines established for the program, and the commissioner of transportation is directed to add the roads to the system. If space is available, a specific business establishment shall not be excluded from participating in the specific service sign program because the establishment does not serve breakfast. The establishment may occupy any available space on a specific service sign if doing so would not exclude a business establishment that does serve breakfast.

The specific service signs shall be within the guidelines prescribed by the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

As portions of State Route 840 are opened, these portions shall be included in the specific service sign program provided for in this part; provided, that eligibility of interchanges and businesses for participation in this program shall be determined in accordance with regulations that the commissioner has promulgated pursuant to this part.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the commissioner of transportation is authorized, subject to the approval of the federal highway administration, to erect specific service signs at Exit 1 (United States Highway 41) on Interstate Highway 75 in Hamilton County; provided, however, that, due to safety considerations, no more than one (1) sign panel may be erected on either approach to the exit and the categories of specific service signs available shall be limited to food and lodging.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the commissioner of transportation is authorized to erect specific service signs at Exit 1 (United States Highway 41) on Interstate 24 and 75 in Hamilton County to provide one (1) sign panel for the categories of gas and camping.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 2; 1991, ch. 282, § 1; 1995, ch. 350, § 1; 1996, ch. 653, § 1; 1999, ch. 359, § 1; 2003, ch. 65, § 1; 2004, ch. 495, § 1.

Cross-References. Public contracts, title 12, ch. 4.

Tourist oriented directional signs, title 54, ch. 5, part 13.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutional requirement that General Assembly pass appropriation for Public Chapter 696, OAG 88-87 (4/19/88).

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-5-1102. Powers of department — Construction contracts.

The department has the authority to provide for the construction and administration of specific service signs.

The department may enter into contracts for construction of specific service signs, the contracts to be subject to §§ 54-5-113 — 54-5-127.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 3.

54-5-1103. Administrative service contracts — Bidding lease payments.

Except as provided in this section, the department shall enter into contracts for the administration of specific service signs. The department may, however, carry out the administration of specific service signs to provide continuity of the program in the case of default of an administrative contractor, or in the interim period between administrative contracts, and to fulfill statutory or regulatory changes made to the program during an existing administrative contract where the administrative contractor is unwilling to provide for statutory or regulatory additions to the program under the terms of the existing contract, and other terms that the department deems appropriate.

Contracts for administrative services include the marketing, management, and maintenance of specific service signs. Any administrative services contract awarded must include provisions requiring an appropriate corporate surety performance bond, security or cash.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as preventing the commissioner from determining whether provision of administrative services for the entire state should be the basis for bids, or whether the provision of the services for segments of the state should be the basis for bids.

Notwithstanding § 12-3-102(a)(8), any contract to perform administrative services shall be awarded to the contractor whose proposal offers the best value for the state rather than the least cost to the retail user of the signs. In determining the best value for the state, the department may consider:

The quality of service offered;

The contractor's overall qualifications to partner with the department. This includes determining fair market value of advertising space and establishing a fee structure that provides a combination of revenue to the department and fair pricing to the advertisers;

The contractor's financial resources and ability to perform;

The percentage of revenue sharing provided to the department by the contractor; and

Any other factor the department considers relevant.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, §§ 4, 6; 1991, ch. 282, § 2; 2013, ch. 471, §§ 1, 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 12-4-109(a)(2), formerly referred to in this section, was transferred to § 12-3-102(a)(8), by Acts 2013, ch. 403, § 9, effective July 1, 2013.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted the first sentence in (a)(2) which read: “Contracts for administrative services shall be subject to §§ 12-4-109 — 12-4-111.”; and rewrote (c) which read: “Any contract to perform administrative services pursuant to this part shall provide for lease payments to the department for a system of specific service signs. The lease payments shall fully reimburse the department for the cost of the signs, which shall include the value of funds used by the department to pay for the signs. The cost shall be recovered over a period of not more than ten (10) years. After the cost has been recovered, the department shall continue to charge a lease cost sufficient to recover the maintenance and replacement cost of the signs.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 471, § 6. May 20, 2013.

54-5-1104. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 8; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 471, § 2, effective May 20, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-1104 concerned successful bidders for contracts.

54-5-1105. Award of contracts to Tennessee based enterprises.

Notwithstanding any law or this part to the contrary, all contracts entered into by the state pursuant to this part shall be awarded to Tennessee-based business enterprises.

[Deleted by 2013 amendment.]

Acts 1988, ch. 696, §§ 12, 15; 2013, ch. 308, § 27.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment deleted (b) which read: “Notwithstanding any law or this part to the contrary, disadvantaged business enterprises shall participate in ten percent (10%) of all contracts entered into by the state for construction of specific service signs pursuant to this part.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

54-5-1106. Nonconforming billboards.

No lease payments, royalty payments, or funds of any type received by the state pursuant to this part shall be used for the purchase of nonconforming billboards or used as payment for the taking or removal of nonconforming billboards.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 13; 2013, ch. 471, § 3.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote the section which read: “(a) There is levied a gross receipts royalty payment of six percent (6%) on the difference between the provider's gross revenues and the lease payments made to the state. The payments shall be made annually on January 31 of each year.“(b)(1) The proceeds from the gross receipts royalty payment shall be allocated and distributed to the highway fund; however, none of the proceeds shall be used for acquisition of outdoor advertising.“(2) No lease payments, royalty payments, or funds of any type received by the state pursuant to this part shall be used for the purchase of nonconforming billboards or used as payment for the taking or removal of nonconforming billboards.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 471, § 6. May 20, 2013.

54-5-1107. Outdoor advertising provisions unaffected.

This part shall not in any manner affect the authorization or regulation of outdoor advertising as set forth in this code.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 9.

54-5-1108. Rules and regulations.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the construction and administration of specific service signs.

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 10.

54-5-1109. [Repealed.]

Acts 1988, ch. 696, § 14; 1990, ch. 721, §§ 1-3; 1993, ch. 94, § 1; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 28, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-5-1109 concerned exemptions.

54-5-1110. Businesses qualified prior to July 1, 2001 — Competitive selection process.

Those food service businesses qualified under this program as of July 1, 2001, and that continue thereafter to be qualified and pay all fees required, shall not be replaced by any business that becomes qualified after July 1, 2001.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), if the department elects to award advertising space based on a competitive selection process, the food service businesses qualified under the program as of July 1, 2001, will need to compete in such a competitive selection process and may be replaced by any business that submits a more competitive proposal under such a process.

Acts 2001, ch. 217, § 1; 2013, ch. 471, § 4.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 471, § 6. May 20, 2013.

54-5-1111. “RV friendly” service signs for businesses that cater to recreational vehicles.

Subject to the prior approval of the federal highway administration, the department is directed to incorporate the use of “RV friendly” markers on specific service signs for business establishments that cater to the needs of persons driving recreational vehicles. A business establishment that qualifies for participation in the specific service sign program and that also qualifies as RV friendly may request that an RV friendly marker be displayed immediately adjacent to the establishment's business logo sign on the appropriate background sign panel. For purposes of this section, the RV friendly marker to be displayed shall be a marker approved by the federal highway administration in the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

In accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, and subject to the approval of the federal highway administration, the department shall promulgate rules and regulations that are necessary to implement this section, including the promulgation of rules and regulations setting forth the minimum requirements that business establishments must meet in order to qualify as RV friendly. The requirements shall include, but shall not be limited to, the availability at each qualifying business establishment of parking spaces, entrances, and exits in sufficient number and of sufficient size and dimensions to easily accommodate recreational vehicles, and the presence of appropriate overhang clearances at all facilities, if applicable.

For the purposes of assisting the federal highway administration in considering the approval of an RV friendly marker for incorporation into the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, the department is directed to submit a request to the federal highway administration for permission to experiment with the use of an RV friendly marker on specific service signs in accordance with this section.

Acts 2005, ch. 337, § 1.